Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1902
Definitions,
where found.

For purposes of the Medical Radiography
Practice Act and elsewhere in the Uniform Credentialing Act, unless the context
otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 38-1903 to 38-1913 apply.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 640;

Laws 2008, LB928, § 6;

Laws 2010, LB849, § 2.